California statutes. Penal Code
(a) (1) If it appears to the person in charge of a county jail, city jail, or juvenile detention facility, or to any judge of a court in the county in which the jail or juvenile detention facility is located, that a person in custody in that jail or juvenile detention facility may have a mental health disorder, that person or judge may cause the prisoner to be taken to a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation pursuant to Section 5150 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and shall inform the facility in writing, which shall be confidential, of the reasons that the person is being taken to the facility. The local mental health director or the director’s designee may examine the prisoner prior to transfer to a facility for
 treatment and evaluation. Upon transfer to a facility, Article 1 (commencing with Section 5150), Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250), Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 5260), Article 5 (commencing with Section 5275), Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300), and Article 7 (commencing with Section 5325) of Chapter 2 and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code apply to the prisoner.

(2) If the court causes the prisoner to be transferred to a 72-hour facility, the court shall immediately notify the local mental health director or the director’s designee, the prosecuting attorney, and counsel for the prisoner in the criminal or juvenile proceedings about that transfer. Where the person in charge of the jail or juvenile detention facility causes the transfer of the prisoner to
 a 72-hour facility, the person shall immediately notify the local mental health director or the director’s designee and each court within the county where the prisoner has a pending proceeding about the transfer. Upon notification by the person in charge of the jail or juvenile detention facility, the court shall immediately notify counsel for the prisoner and the prosecuting attorney in the criminal or juvenile proceedings about that transfer.

(3) When a person in custody is transferred from a jail to a 72-hour facility for treatment and evaluation pursuant to this subdivision, the fact that the person has temporary access to food, clothing, shelter, personal safety, and necessary medical care while incarcerated is not a basis to conclude that the person is able to provide for their basic personal needs, which shall be evaluated based
 upon the person’s ability to provide for those needs outside the jail setting.

(b) If a prisoner is detained in, or remanded to, a facility pursuant to the articles of the Welfare and Institutions Code listed in subdivision (a), the facility shall transmit a report, which shall be confidential, to the person in charge of the jail or juvenile detention facility or judge of the court who caused the prisoner to be taken to the facility and to the local mental health director or the director’s designee, concerning the condition of the prisoner. A new report shall be transmitted at the end of each period of confinement provided for in those articles, upon conversion to voluntary status, and upon filing of temporary letters of conservatorship.

(c) A prisoner who has been transferred
 to an inpatient facility pursuant to this section may convert to voluntary inpatient status without obtaining the consent of the court, the person in charge of the jail or juvenile detention facility, or the local mental health director. At the beginning of that conversion to voluntary status, the person in charge of the facility shall transmit a report to the person in charge of the jail or juvenile detention facility or judge of the court who caused the prisoner to be taken to the facility, counsel for the prisoner, prosecuting attorney, and local mental health director or the director’s designee.

(d) If the prisoner is detained in, or remanded to, a facility pursuant to the articles of the Welfare and Institutions Code listed in subdivision (a), the time passed in the facility shall count as part of the prisoner’s sentence. When the
 prisoner is detained in, or remanded to, the facility, the person in charge of the jail or juvenile detention facility shall advise the professional person in charge of the facility of the expiration date of the prisoner’s sentence. If the prisoner is to be released from the facility before the expiration date, the professional person in charge shall notify the local mental health director or the director’s designee, counsel for the prisoner, the prosecuting attorney, and the person in charge of the jail or juvenile detention facility, who shall send for, take, and receive the prisoner back into the jail or juvenile detention facility.

(e) A defendant, either charged with or convicted of a criminal offense, or a minor alleged to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, may be concurrently subject to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act
 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(f) If a prisoner is detained in a facility pursuant to the articles of the Welfare and Institutions Code listed in subdivision (a), and if the person in charge of the facility determines that arraignment or trial would be detrimental to the well-being of the prisoner, the time spent in the facility shall not be computed in any statutory time requirements for arraignment or trial in any pending criminal or juvenile proceedings. This section shall not affect any statutory time requirements for arraignment or trial in any pending criminal or juvenile proceedings.

(g) For purposes of this section, the term “juvenile detention facility” includes any state, county, or private home or institution in
 which wards or dependent children of the juvenile court or persons awaiting a hearing before the juvenile court are detained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 330, Sec. 2.   (SB 820)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.7.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 4011 and 4011.5, when it appears that the prisoner in need of medical or surgical treatment necessitating hospitalization or in need of medical or hospital care was arrested for, charged with, or convicted of an offense constituting a misdemeanor, the court in proceedings under Section 4011 or the sheriff or jailer in action taken under Section 4011.5 may direct that the guard be removed from the prisoner while he or she is in the hospital. If that direction is given, any prisoner who knowingly escapes or attempts to escape from that hospital shall upon conviction thereof be guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by imprisonment for not to exceed one year in the county jail if the escape or attempt to escape was not by force
 or violence. However, if the escape is by force or violence the prisoner shall be guilty of a felony and punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or in the county jail for not exceeding one year; provided, that when that second term of imprisonment is to be served in the county jail it shall commence from the time that prisoner would otherwise be discharged from that jail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 480.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.8.

A person in custody who has been charged with or convicted of a criminal offense may make voluntary application for inpatient or outpatient mental health services in accordance with Section 5003 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If such services require absence from the jail premises, consent from the person in charge of the jail or from any judge of a court in the county in which the jail is located, and from the director of the county mental health program in which services are to be rendered, shall be obtained. The local mental health director or his designee may examine the prisoner prior to the transfer from the jail.

Where the court approves voluntary treatment for a jail inmate for whom criminal proceedings are pending, the court shall forthwith notify counsel for the prisoner and the prosecuting attorney about such approval. Where the person in charge of the jail approves voluntary treatment for a prisoner for whom criminal proceedings are pending, the person in charge of the jail shall immediately notify each court within the county where the prisoner has a pending proceeding about such approval; upon notification by the jailer the court shall forthwith notify the prosecuting attorney and counsel for the prisoner in the criminal proceedings about such transfer.

If the prisoner voluntarily obtains treatment in a facility or is placed on outpatient treatment pursuant to Section 5003 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the time passed therein shall count as part of the prisoner’s sentence. When the prisoner is permitted absence from the jail for voluntary treatment, the person in charge of the jail shall advise the professional person in charge of the facility of the expiration date of the prisoner’s sentence. If the prisoner is to be released from the facility before such expiration date, the professional person in charge shall notify the local mental health director or his designee, counsel for the prisoner, the prosecuting attorney, and the person in charge of the jail, who shall send for, take, and receive the prisoner back into the jail. 

A denial of an application for voluntary mental health services shall be reviewable only by mandamus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1258.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.9.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 4011 and 4011.5, when it appears that the prisoner in need of medical or surgical treatment necessitating hospitalization or in need of medical or hospital care was arrested for, charged with, or convicted of an offense constituting a felony, the court in proceedings under Section 4011 or the sheriff or jailer in action taken under Section 4011. 5 may direct that the guard be removed from the prisoner while he is in the hospital, if it reasonably appears that the prisoner is physically unable to effectuate an escape or the prisoner does not constitute a danger to life or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 80.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.10.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide county sheriffs, chiefs of police, and directors or administrators of local detention facilities with an incentive to not engage in practices designed to avoid payment of legitimate health care costs for the treatment or examination of persons lawfully in their custody, and to promptly pay those costs as requested by the provider of services. Further, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage county sheriffs, chiefs of police, and directors or administrators of local detention facilities to bargain in good faith when negotiating a service contract with hospitals providing health care services.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a county
 sheriff, police chief, or other public agency that contracts for health care services, may contract with providers of health care services for care to local law enforcement patients. Hospitals that do not contract for health care services with the county sheriff, police chief, or other public agency shall provide health care services to local law enforcement patients at a rate equal to 110 percent of the hospital’s actual costs according to the most recent Hospital Annual Financial Data report issued by the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, as calculated using a cost-to-charge ratio, or, for claims that have not previously been paid or otherwise determined by local law enforcement, according to the most recently approved cost-to-charge ratio from the Medicare Program. The hospital, with the approval of the county sheriff, police chief, or other public agency responsible for providing health care services to local law enforcement patients, may choose the most appropriate cost-to-charge
 ratio and shall provide notice to the county sheriff, police chief, or other public agency, as applicable, of any change. If the hospital uses the cost-to-charge ratio from the Medicare Program, the hospital shall attach supporting Medicare documentation and an expected payment calculation to the claim. If a claim does not contain the supporting Medicare documentation and expected payment calculation, or if, within 60 days of the hospital’s request for approval to use the cost-to-charge ratio from the Medicare Program, approval is not granted by the county sheriff, police chief, or other public agency responsible for providing health care services to local law enforcement patients, the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development cost-to-charge ratio shall be used to calculate the payment.

(c) A county sheriff or police chief shall not request the release of an inmate from custody for the purpose of allowing the inmate to seek medical
 care at a hospital, and then immediately rearrest the same individual upon discharge from the hospital, unless the hospital determines this action would enable it to bill and collect from a third-party payment source.

(d) The California Hospital Association, the University of California, the California State Sheriffs’ Association, and the California Police Chiefs Association shall, immediately upon enactment of this section, convene the Inmate Health Care and Medical Provider Fair Pricing Working Group. The working group shall consist of at least six members from the California Hospital Association and the University of California, and six members from the California State Sheriffs’ Association and the California Police Chiefs Association. Each organization should give great weight and consideration to appointing members of the working group with diverse geographic and demographic interests. The working group shall meet as needed to identify
 and resolve industry issues that create fiscal barriers to timely and affordable inmate health care. In addition, the working group shall address issues, including, but not limited to, inmates being admitted for care and later rearrested and any other fiscal barriers to hospitals being able to enter into fair market contracts with public agencies. To the extent that the rate provisions of this statute result in a disproportionate share of local law enforcement patients being treated at any one hospital or system of hospitals, the working group shall address this issue. No reimbursement is required under this provision.

(e) This section does not require or encourage a hospital or public agency to replace any existing arrangements that any city police chief, county sheriff, or other public agency that contracts for health care services for local law enforcement patients has with health care providers.

(f) An entity that provides ambulance or any other emergency or nonemergency response service to a sheriff or police chief, and that does not contract with their departments for that service, shall be reimbursed for the service at the rate established by Medicare. Neither the sheriff nor the police chief shall reimburse a provider of any of these services that his or her department has not contracted with at a rate that exceeds the provider’s reasonable and allowable costs, regardless of whether the provider is located within or outside of California.

(g) For the purposes of this section, “reasonable and allowable costs” shall be defined in accordance with Part 413 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Publication Numbers 15-1 and 15-2.

(h) For purposes of
 this section, in those counties in which the sheriff does not administer a jail facility, a director or administrator of a local department of corrections established pursuant to Section 23013 of the Government Code is the person who may contract for services provided to jail inmates in the facilities he or she administers in those counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 119, Sec. 1.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.11.

(a) (1) Through December 31, 2022, the board of supervisors in each county, in consultation with the county sheriff, may designate an entity or entities to assist county jail inmates with submitting an application for a health insurance affordability program consistent with federal requirements.

(2) The board of supervisors shall not designate the county sheriff as an entity to assist with submitting an application for a health insurance affordability program for county jail inmates unless the county sheriff agrees to perform this function.

(3) If the board of supervisors designates a community-based organization
 as an entity to assist with submitting an application for a health insurance affordability program for county jail inmates, the designation shall be subject to approval by the jail administrator or their designee.

(b) (1) The jail administrator, or their designee, may coordinate with an entity designated pursuant to subdivision (a), through December 31, 2022.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2023, the jail administrator, or their designee, shall coordinate with an entity designated pursuant to subdivision (h), as applicable.

(c) Consistent with federal law, a county jail inmate who is currently enrolled in the Medi-Cal program shall remain eligible for, and shall not be terminated from, the program due to their incarceration
 unless required by federal law, they become otherwise ineligible, or the inmate’s suspension of benefits has ended pursuant to Section 14011.10 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) Notwithstanding any other state law, and only to the extent federal law allows and federal financial participation is available, an entity designated pursuant to subdivision (a) or (h) is authorized to act on behalf of a county jail inmate for the purpose of applying for, or determinations of, Medi-Cal eligibility for acute inpatient hospital services authorized by Section 14053.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. An entity designated pursuant to subdivision (a) or (h) shall not determine Medi-Cal eligibility or redetermine Medi-Cal eligibility, unless the entity is the county human services agency.

(e) The
 fact that an applicant is an inmate shall not, in and of itself, preclude a county human services agency from processing an application for the Medi-Cal program submitted to it by, or on behalf of, that inmate.

(f) For purposes of this section, “health insurance affordability program” means a program that is one of the following:

(1) The state’s Medi-Cal program under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

(2) The state’s children’s health insurance program (CHIP) under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act.

(3) A program that makes coverage in a qualified health plan through the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Section
 100500 of the Government Code with advance payment of the premium tax credit established under Section 36B of the Internal Revenue Code available to qualified individuals.

(4) A program that makes available coverage in a qualified health plan through the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Section 100500 of the Government Code with cost-sharing reductions established under Section 1402 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) and any subsequent amendments to that act.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters or similar instructions,
 without taking any further regulatory action.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2023, the board of supervisors in each county, in consultation with the county sheriff, shall designate an entity or entities to assist county jail inmates with submitting an application for, or otherwise assisting their enrollment in, a health insurance affordability program consistent with federal requirements. The board of supervisors in each county, in consultation with the chief probation officer, shall designate an entity or entities to assist juvenile inmates in county juvenile facilities with submitting an application for, or otherwise assisting with an application for enrollment in, a health insurance affordability program consistent with federal requirements.

(2) The board of supervisors shall not designate the county sheriff as an entity to assist with submitting an application for a health insurance affordability program for county jail inmates unless the county sheriff agrees to perform this function, and shall not designate the chief probation officer as an entity to assist with submitting an application for a health insurance affordability program for juvenile inmates unless the chief probation officer agrees to perform this function.

(3) If the board of supervisors designates a community-based organization as an entity to assist with submitting an application for a health insurance affordability program for county jail inmates, the designation for county jail inmates shall be subject to approval by the jail administrator or their designee, and the designation for juvenile
 inmates shall be subject to approval by the chief probation officer or their designee.

(4) (A) The department shall develop the data elements required to implement this section, in consultation with interested stakeholders that include representatives of counties, county sheriffs, county probation agencies, and whole person care pilot lead entities with experience working with incarcerated individuals.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the department, counties, county sheriffs, and county probation agencies shall share the information and data necessary to facilitate the enrollment of inmates in health insurance affordability programs on or before their date of release and to appropriately suspend and unsuspend Medi-Cal coverage for beneficiaries.

(5) (A) No sooner than January 1, 2023, the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with counties, county sheriffs, probation departments, Medi-Cal managed care plans, and Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, shall develop and implement a mandatory process by which county jails and county juvenile facilities coordinate with Medi-Cal managed care plans and Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems to facilitate continued behavioral health treatment in the community for county jail inmates and juvenile inmates that were receiving behavioral health services before their release.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Sections 11812 and 11845.5 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 5328 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code, the sharing of health information, records, and other data with and among counties, Medi-Cal managed care plans, Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, and other authorized providers or plan entities shall be permitted to the extent necessary to implement this paragraph. The department shall issue guidance identifying permissible data-sharing arrangements.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, the following definitions shall apply:

(i) “Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(ii) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (j) of Section
 14184.101 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 346.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4012.

When a pestilence or contagious disease breaks out in or near a jail, and the physician thereof certifies that it is liable to endanger the health of the prisoners, the county judge may, by a written appointment, designate a safe and convenient place in the county, or the jail in a contiguous county, as the place of their confinement. The appointment must be filed in the office of the clerk of the court, and authorize the sheriff to remove the prisoners to the place or jail designated, and there confine them until they can be safely returned to the jail from which they were taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 566.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4013.

(a) A warden, sheriff, or jailer upon whom a paper in a judicial proceeding, directed to an incarcerated person in the custody of the warden, sheriff, or jailer, is served, shall forthwith deliver the paper to the incarcerated person, with a note thereon of the time of its service. The warden, sheriff, or jailer is liable to the incarcerated person for all damages occasioned thereby for neglecting to do so.

(b) Service directed to a person who is incarcerated within any institution in this state may be served by any person who may lawfully serve process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 255, Sec. 1.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4014.

The sheriff, when necessary, may, with the assent in writing of the county judge, or in a city, of the mayor thereof, employ a temporary guard for the protection of the county jail, or for the safekeeping of prisoners, the expenses of which are a county charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

4015.

(a) The sheriff shall receive all persons committed to jail by competent authority. The board of supervisors shall provide the sheriff with necessary food, clothing, and bedding, for those prisoners, which shall be of a quality and quantity at least equal to the minimum standards and requirements prescribed by the Board of Corrections for the feeding, clothing, and care of prisoners in all county, city and other local jails and detention facilities. Except as provided in Section 4016, the expenses thereof shall be paid out of the county treasury.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed in a manner that would require the sheriff to receive a person who is in need of immediate medical care until the person has been transported to a hospital or medical facility so that his or her medical needs can be addressed prior to booking into county jail.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted in a manner that would impose upon a city or its law enforcement agency any obligation to pay the cost of medical services rendered to any individual in need of immediate medical care who has been arrested by city law enforcement personnel and transported to a hospital or medical facility prior to being delivered to and received at the county jail or other detention facility for booking.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting the act adding this subdivision to ensure that the costs associated with providing medical care to an arrested person are borne by the arrested person’s private medical insurance or any other source of medical cost coverage for which the arrested person is eligible.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 697) by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1369, Sec. 6.   Effective October 27, 1992.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1369.)
-------------------------------------------

4016.

Whenever a person is committed upon process in a civil action or proceeding, except when the people of this State are a party thereto, the sheriff is not bound to receive such person, unless security is given on the part of the party at whose instance the process is issued, by a deposit of money, to meet the expenses for him of necessary food, clothing, and bedding, or to detain such person any longer than these expenses are provided for. This section does not apply to cases where a party is committed as a punishment for disobedience to the mandates, process, writs, or orders of court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

4016.5.

A city or county shall be reimbursed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for costs incurred resulting from the detention of a state prisoner or a person sentenced or referred to the state prison when the detention meets any of the following conditions:

(a) (1) The detention results from a new commitment, or a referral pursuant to Section 1203.03, once the abstract of judgment has been completed, the department’s intake control unit has been notified by the county that the prisoner is ready to be transported pursuant to Section 1216, and the department is unable to accept delivery of the prisoner. The reimbursement shall be provided for each day starting on the day following the fifth working day after the date of notification by the county, if the prisoner remains ready to be delivered and the department is unable to
 receive the prisoner. If a county delivers or attempts to deliver a person to the department without the prior notification required by this paragraph, the date of the delivery or attempted delivery shall be recognized as the notification date pursuant to this paragraph. The notification and verification required by the county for prisoners ready to be transported, and reimbursement provided to the county for prisoners that the department is unable to receive, shall be made pursuant to procedures established by the department.

(2) A city or county shall be reimbursed by the department from funds appropriated in Item 5240-001-0001 of the annual Budget Act for costs incurred pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) The reimbursement required by this section shall be expended for maintenance, upkeep, and improvement of jail conditions, facilities, and services. Before the county is reimbursed by the department, the total amount of all charges against that county
 authorized by law for services rendered by the department shall be first deducted from the gross amount of reimbursement authorized by this section. The net reimbursement shall be calculated and paid monthly by the department. The department shall withhold all or part of the net reimbursement to a county whose jail facility or facilities do not conform to minimum standards for local detention facilities as authorized by Section 6030 only if the county is failing to make reasonable efforts to correct differences, with consideration given to the resources available for those purposes.

(4) “Costs incurred resulting from the detention,” as used in this section, shall include the same cost factors as are utilized by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in determining the cost of prisoner care in state correctional facilities.

(b) No city, county, or other jurisdiction may file, and the state may not reimburse, a claim pursuant to this section
 that is presented to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or to any other agency or department of the state more than six months after the close of the month in which the costs were incurred.

(c) The changes to this section made by the act that added this subdivision shall be effective on October 1, 2011.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 52.   (AB 117)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, pursuant to Secs. 68 and 69 of Ch. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

4017.

All persons confined in the county jail, industrial farm, road camp, or city jail under a final judgment of imprisonment rendered in a criminal action or proceeding and all persons confined in the county jail, industrial farm, road camp, or city jail as a condition of probation after suspension of imposition of a sentence or suspension of execution of sentence may be required by an order of the board of supervisors or city council to perform labor on the public works or ways in the county or city, respectively, and to engage in the prevention and suppression of forest, brush and grass fires upon lands within the county or city, respectively, or upon lands in adjacent counties where the suppression of fires would afford fire protection to lands within the county.

Whenever any such person so in custody shall suffer injuries or death while working in the prevention or suppression of forest, brush or grass fires he shall be considered to be an employee of the county or city, respectively, for the purposes of compensation under the provisions of the Labor Code regarding workmen’s compensation and such work shall be performed under the direct supervision of a local, state or federal employee whose duties include fire prevention and suppression work. A regularly employed member of an organized fire department shall not be required to directly supervise more than 20 such persons so in custody. 

As used in this section, “labor on the public works” includes clerical and menial labor in the county jail, industrial farm, camps maintained for the labor of such persons upon the ways in the county, or city jail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 907.)
-------------------------------------------

4017.1.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any person confined in a county jail, industrial farm, road camp, or city jail who is required or permitted by an order of the board of supervisors or city council to perform work, and any person while performing community service in lieu of a fine or custody or who is assigned to work furlough, may not be employed to perform any function that provides access to personal information of private individuals, including, but not limited to, the following: addresses; telephone numbers; health insurance, taxpayer, school, or employee identification numbers; mothers’ maiden names; demand deposit account, debit card, credit card, savings account, or
 checking account numbers, PINs, or passwords; social security numbers; places of employment; dates of birth; state- or government-issued driver’s license or identification numbers; United States Citizenship and Immigration Services-assigned numbers; government passport numbers; unique biometric data, such as fingerprints, facial scan identifiers, voice prints, retina or iris images, or other similar identifiers; unique electronic identification numbers; address or routing codes; and telecommunication identifying information or access devices.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), persons assigned to work furlough programs may be permitted to work in situations that allow them to retain or look at a driver’s license or credit card for no longer than the period of time needed to complete an immediate
 transaction. However, no person assigned to work furlough shall be placed in any position that may require the deposit of a credit card or driver’s license as insurance or surety.

(b) Any person confined in a county jail, industrial farm, road camp, or city jail who has access to any personal information shall disclose that they are confined before taking any personal information from anyone.

(c) This section shall not apply to inmates in employment programs or public service facilities where incidental contact with personal information may occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 48.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4017.5.

In any case in which a person is confined to a city or county jail for a definite period of time for contempt pursuant to an action or proceeding other than a criminal action or proceeding, all of the provisions of law authorizing, requiring, or otherwise relating to, the performance of labor or work by persons sentenced to such facilities for like periods of time under a judgment of imprisonment, or a fine and imprisonment until the fine is paid or as a condition of probation after suspension of imposition of a sentence or suspension of execution of sentence, in a criminal action or proceeding, shall apply.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the confinement of any prisoner contrary to the provisions of Section 4001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

4018.

The board of supervisors making such order may prescribe and enforce the rules and regulations under which such labor is to be performed; and provide clothing of such a distinctive character for said prisoners as such board, in its discretion, may deem proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

4018.1.

Subject to the availability of adequate state funding for these purposes, the sheriff of each county shall provide inmates who have been sentenced for drug-related offenses with information about behavior that places a person at high risk for contracting the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), and about the prevention of the transmission of acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS). Each county sheriff or the chief county probation officer shall provide all inmates who have been sentenced for drug-related offenses, who are within one month of release, or who have been placed on probation, with information about behavior that places a person at high risk for contracting HIV, about the prevention of the transmission of AIDS, and about agencies and facilities that provide testing, counseling, medical, and support services for AIDS victims. Information about AIDS prevention shall be solicited by each county sheriff or chief county probation officer from the State Department of Health Services, the county health officer, or local agencies providing services to persons with AIDS. The Director of Health Services, or his or her designee, shall approve protocols pertaining to the information to be disseminated under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1301, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4018.5.

The sheriff or other official in charge of county correctional facilities may, subject to the approval of the board of supervisors, provide for the vocational training and rehabilitation of prisoners confined in the county jail, or any county industrial farm or county or joint county road camp. The sheriff or other official in charge of county correctional facilities may, subject to such approval, enter into an agreement with the governing board of any school district maintaining secondary schools, for the maintenance, by the district, for such prisoners, of adult education classes conducted pursuant to the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

4018.6.

The sheriff of the county may authorize the temporary removal under custody or temporary release without custody of any inmate of the county jail, honor farm, or other detention facility for family emergencies or for purposes preparatory to his return to the community, if the sheriff concludes that such inmate is a fit subject therefor. Any such temporary removal shall not be for a period of more than three days. When an inmate is released for purposes preparatory to his return to the community, the sheriff may require the inmate to reimburse the county, in whole or in part, for expenses incurred by the county in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------

4019.

(a) This section applies in all of the following cases:
